Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 21 Stopping, Standing, and Parking Restrictions

31-21-1.
Stopping on traveled portion of open highway prohibited.

Upon any highway outside of a business or residence district, no person shall stop, park, or leave standing any vehicle, whether attended or unattended, upon the paved or main traveled part of the highway when it is practical to stop, park, or leave the vehicle off that part of the highway. In every event, an unobstructed width of the highway opposite a standing vehicle shall be left for the free passage of other vehicles, and a clear view of the stopped vehicle shall be available from a distance of two hundred feet (200´) in each direction upon the highway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 32, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-21-1

.

31-21-2.
Removal of vehicle parked on highway.

Whenever any police officer finds a vehicle standing upon a highway in violation of §

31-21-1

, the officer is authorized to move the vehicle, or require the driver or other person in charge of the vehicle to move the vehicle, to a position off the paved or main traveled part of the highway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 32, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-21-2

.

31-21-3.
Removal of vehicle obstructing traffic on bridge or in tunnel.

Whenever any police officer finds a vehicle, whether attended or unattended, disabled upon any bridge or causeway or in any tunnel where the vehicle constitutes an obstruction to traffic, the officer is authorized to provide for the removal of the vehicle to the nearest garage, service station, or other place of safety.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 32, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-21-3

; P.L. 1965, ch. 165, § 1.

31-21-4.
Places where parking or stopping prohibited.

No person shall stop, stand, or park a vehicle, except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with law or the directions of a police officer or traffic control device, in any of the following places:

On a sidewalk;

In front of a public or private driveway;

Within an intersection;

Within eight feet (8´) of a fire hydrant;

On a crosswalk;

Within twenty feet (20´) of a crosswalk at an intersection;

Within thirty feet (30´) upon the approach to any flashing beacon, stop sign, or traffic control signal located at the side of a roadway;

Between a safety zone and the adjacent curb, or within thirty feet (30´) of points on the curb immediately opposite the ends of a safety zone, unless the traffic authority indicates a different length by signs or markings;

Within fifty feet (50´) of the nearest rail of a railroad crossing;

Within twenty feet (20´) of the driveway entrance to any fire station, and on the side of a street opposite the entrance to any fire station within seventy-five feet (75´) of the entrance (when properly sign-posted);

Alongside or opposite any street excavation or obstruction when stopping, standing, or parking would obstruct traffic;

On the roadway side of any vehicle stopped or parked at the edge or curb of a street;

Upon any bridge or other elevated structure upon a highway or within a highway tunnel;

At any place where official signs prohibit stopping;

At any curb cut or ramp for persons with disabilities;

On any bicycle lane, trail, or path; or

Upon any crosshatched access aisle adjacent to disability parking spaces.

The following vehicles are exempt from the prohibitions contained in subsection (a):

School buses or worker transport buses that are loading or unloading children or workers, provided that the school bus or worker transport bus operates its flashing bus-safety lights;

Subject to the provisions of §

31-21-6

, vehicles that are momentarily stopped, standing, or parked to admit or discharge passengers;

Taxicabs that are momentarily stopped, standing or parked to admit or discharge passengers;

Vehicles that are momentarily stopped, standing, or parked for the purpose of, and while actually engaged in, loading or unloading property;

Vehicles that are owned or operated by the state or a city or town when the vehicle must stop, stand, or park to perform maintenance or repair work on an area where stopping, standing or parking is prohibited under the provisions of subsection (a);

Vehicles that are disabled in such a manner, and to such extent, that the vehicle operator cannot avoid stopping or temporarily leaving the disabled vehicle in an area where stopping, standing, or parking is prohibited under the provisions of subsection (a);

Vehicles that are momentarily stopped to allow oncoming traffic to pass before making a right or left-hand turn, or in preparation for or while negotiating an exit from the road.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 32, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-21-4

; P.L. 1988, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 71; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 71; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 118; P.L. 2005, ch. 64, § 6; P.L. 2005, ch. 67, § 6; P.L. 2006, ch. 651, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 533, § 1.

31-21-5.
Unauthorized movement of vehicle into prohibited area.

No person shall move a vehicle not lawfully under his or her control into any prohibited area or away from a curb to a distance that is unlawful.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 32, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-21-5

.

31-21-6.
Admission or discharge of passengers.

The driver of any vehicle admitting or discharging passengers to or from his or her vehicle shall do so as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 32, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-21-6

.

31-21-7.
Parallel parking — Proximity to curb.

Except as otherwise provided in §§

31-21-8

and

31-21-9

, every vehicle stopped or parked upon a roadway where there are adjacent curbs shall be stopped or parked with the right-hand wheels of the vehicle parallel to and within twelve inches (12") of the right-hand curb.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 32, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-21-7

.

31-21-8.
Left curb parking.

Local authorities may by ordinance permit parking of vehicles with the left-hand wheels adjacent to and within twelve inches (12") of the left-hand curb of a one-way roadway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 32, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-21-8

.

31-21-9.
Angle parking.

Local authorities may by ordinance permit angle parking on any roadway, except that angle parking shall not be permitted on any federal aid or state highway unless the state traffic commission has determined by resolution or order entered in its minutes, that the roadway is of sufficient width to permit angle parking without interfering with the free movement of traffic.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 32, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-21-9

.

31-21-10.
Restriction of parking on state highways.

The state traffic commission, with respect to highways under its jurisdiction, may place signs prohibiting or restricting the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles on any highway where in its opinion, as evidenced by resolution or order entered in its minutes, such stopping, standing, or parking is dangerous to those using the highway or where the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles would unduly interfere with the free movement of traffic on it. The signs shall be official signs and no person shall stop, stand, or park any vehicle in violation of the restrictions stated on the signs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 32, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-21-10

.

31-21-10.1.
Removal of vehicles parked in excess of twenty-four hours.

No motor vehicle shall be parked upon any highway under the jurisdiction of the state traffic commission for a continuous period in excess of twenty-four (24) hours. Any law enforcement officer, state or municipal, may order the removal of the vehicle by towing. Any charges incurred for the towing shall be recoverable from the owner of the vehicle by the state or the municipality paying for the towing by civil action commenced in the district court for the district in which the illegal parking occurred. The civil action shall not be available, however, if the owner of the vehicle pays towing charges directly to the person who furnished the towing services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 138, § 1.

31-21-11.
Removal of disabled vehicle obstructing traffic on state highway, state bridge, or state tunnel.

Whenever a vehicle, whether attended or unattended, is disabled upon any state highway, state bridge, state causeway, or in a state tunnel where the vehicle constitutes an obstruction to traffic, the department of transportation is authorized to remove, or to provide for the removal of, the vehicle to the nearest garage, service station, or other place of safety at no expense to the owner or operator of the disabled vehicle for its removal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 165, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 17; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 17.

31-21-12.
Acquisition, maintenance, and operation of tow trucks by department of transportation.

The department of transportation is authorized to acquire, equip, maintain and operate not more than four (4) tow trucks, and to assign state employees to the trucks for the removal of disabled motor vehicles from state highways, state bridges, state causeways, or state tunnels in accordance with §

31-21-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 165, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 17; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 17.

31-21-13.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 226, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1980, ch. 303, § 1.

31-21-14.
Opening vehicle doors.

No person shall open the door of a motor vehicle on the roadways, streets, or highways of this state, available to moving traffic, unless and until it is reasonably safe to do so, and can be done without interfering with the movement of other traffic, including pedestrians and bicycles on sidewalks, shoulders, or bicycle lanes. No person shall leave a door open on the side of a vehicle available to moving traffic, including pedestrians and bicycles on sidewalks, shoulders or bicycle lanes, for a period of time longer than necessary to load or unload passengers. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be fined as provided in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 58, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 118; P.L. 2005, ch. 64, § 6; P.L. 2005, ch. 67, § 6; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 8.

31-21-15.
Temporary no parking.

In the event that the state or any municipality creates a temporary parking ban in a given area, any signs within that area allowing parking shall be covered in such a manner that the lettering on the signs shall not be visible, provided that, the provisions of this section pertaining to the covering of signs need not be complied with during any snow emergency or other emergency, or when the state or municipality is conducting any street sweeping or other maintenance activities. Any costs to be incurred shall be borne by the municipality in which the signs are located, and the provisions of this section shall not be considered as state mandated costs pursuant to chapter 13 of title 45.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 419, § 1.

31-21-16.
Liability of owner, operator, and lessee.

The owner of a rented or leased motor vehicle shall be entitled to establish non-liability for parking violations by providing to the traffic tribunal or any municipality which has jurisdiction over parking tickets, a copy of a written rental or lease agreement which shall be prima facie evidence that the lessee was the operator of the vehicle.

The issuing authority shall provide to the owner of a rented or leased vehicle a notice, in writing, of each parking violation in which a motor vehicle owned by the rental or leasing company is involved, including the license number of the vehicle and the date and time of the parking violation. Upon receipt of this notice the owner of a rented or leased vehicle shall inform the issuing authority, within twenty (20) days, to the extent available, the operator’s name, home address, employer, employer’s address, and local address, if any.

The renter or lessee shall not be considered an agent of the owner if the owner is engaged in the business of renting or leasing vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 419, § 1.

31-21-17.
Motorcycle parking privileges.

Whenever the proprietor of any shopping center including a shopping mall shall provide for parking spaces designated for use by motorcycles only, then no person shall park any vehicle other than a properly registered motorcycle in the space. Any person who unlawfully parks a vehicle in parking spaces designated for motorcycles shall be fined twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for a first violation, seventy-five dollars ($75.00) for a second violation, and one hundred dollars ($100) for a third or subsequent violation. The vehicle may be subject to towing at the owner’s expense.

Enforcement of the parking provisions of this section shall be enforced by the local authorities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 497, § 1.

31-21-18.
Electric vehicle charging station parking restrictions.

For the purposes of this section, “electric vehicle charging station” means a public or private parking space that is served by charging equipment that has as its primary purpose the transfer of electric energy to a battery or other energy storage device in an electric vehicle.

No person shall stop, stand, or park a vehicle in any electric vehicle charging station provided on any public or private parking space if the vehicle is not connected to the charging equipment and where the electric vehicle charging station is indicated by signage identifying the station as an electric vehicle charging station and indicating that it is only for electric vehicle charging and subject to a parking violation.

Enforcement of the parking provisions of this section shall be enforced by the local or state authorities on public or private property when the location of the parking spaces is within the purview of the state building code, chapter 27.3 of title 23.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 259, § 1.